District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.19d

Effect of amendment or revocation of anatomical gift upon Registry.

(a)

If a donor amends an anatomical gift, or revokes one or more, but not all, anatomical gifts, the Registry shall be promptly revised to reflect the gift or gifts as amended.

(b)

If a donor revokes all anatomical gifts, the name of the former donor shall be promptly removed from the Registry.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 20d, 55 DCR 2532